Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on Corrections Medical Care is established.
(2)(a) The task force consists of 11 members appointed as follows:
(A) The Governor shall appoint five members with the following qualifications:
(i) At least one member must be a substance use disorder or mental health care clinician.
(ii) At least one member must be a primary care clinician who serves Medicaid  patients.
(iii) At  least two members must have been adults in custody, or family members of adults
in custody, who received medical care  while in the custody of the Department of Corrections.
(B) The President of the Senate shall appoint two members from among  members of the
Senate.
(C) The Speaker  of the House of Representatives shall appoint two members from among
members of the House of Representatives.
(D) The  Director of the Department of Corrections shall appoint two members repres-
enting the medical staff of the department.
(b) The Corrections Ombudsman as described in ORS 423.400 shall  serve as an ex officio
nonvoting member  of the task force and is not considered a member for the purposes of this
subsection.
(3) The task force shall:
(a) Conduct a review of  the process by which adults in Department of Corrections cus-
tody file grievances concerning access to and the provision of medical  care to determine the
level of accountability and transparency the process provides to adults in  custody and the
interests of the state and whether the process  conforms with the right of adults in custody
to community-level medical care.
(b) Conduct a review of the current medical care standards of care  in the department to
determine whether the standards align with the  right of adults in custody to community-
Enrolled House Bill 3035 (HB 3035-B) Page 1
level medical care. The report resulting from the review must include a recommended  pri-
oritized list of  medical care, including mental and oral health and similar to the Medicaid
prioritization list, that meets community  standards. The report must further include the
recommendation of meaningful access  timelines for each type of care that must be equitably
available to all adults in custody in all department facilities.
(c) Review timelines and goals for the adoption of an  electronic health records system
by the department. The task force shall review the current  adoption timeline and process to
ensure appropriate goals, timelines and outcomes are  being achieved, with the priority being
expedited adoption of the platform most able  to improve continuity of care with community
practitioners, the seamless sharing of records and the ability for outcomes  and services to
be reported to the public.
(4) A majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(5) Official action  by the task force requires the approval of a majority of the voting
members of the task force.
(6) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(7) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an  appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(8) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call  of the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(9) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(10)(a) The task force shall submit a report in  the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to  the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to health and the judiciary no later than September 15, 2022.
(b) No later than September  15, 2022, the task force shall provide the recommendations
described in subsection (3)(b) of this section to the  Department of Corrections, and the de-
partment shall publish the recommendations on the website of the department.
(11) The Legislative Policy and  Research Director shall provide staff support to the task
force.
(12) Members of the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force are  nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(13) Members of the task force who are not members of the  Legislative Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on  the task
force.
(14) All agencies of state government, as defined  in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance  of the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the
task force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
(1) Beginning no  later than December 31, 2021, and every six months there-
after, the Department of Corrections  shall report to the interim committees of the Legisla-
tive Assembly related  to the judiciary and health care, in the manner provided under ORS
192.245, the following information:
(a) Progress on the adoption of an electronic health records system;
(b) The number of grievances filed by adults in  custody concerning the provision of
medical care;
(c) The medical services available to adults in custody within department facilities; and
(d) If applicable, the progress and impact of a department program that assigns health
care navigators to adults in custody.
(2) No later  than December 31, 2022, the Department of Corrections, in consultation with
the Oregon Health Authority, shall report to the interim committees of  the Legislative As-
sembly related to the judiciary and health care, in the manner provided under ORS 192.245,
health outcomes concerning all adults in the custody of the department,  including health
Enrolled House Bill 3035 (HB 3035-B) Page 2
trends and any information the department determines relevant  to the effectiveness of the
work of  the Task Force on Corrections Medical Care described in section 1 of this 2021 Act
and, if applicable,  any department program in which health care navigators are assigned to
adults in custody.
SECTION 3. Sections 1 and 2 of this 2021 Act are repealed on June 30, 2023.
SECTION 4. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Passed by House June 21, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3035 (HB 3035-B) Page 3